Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.040

Report to chief law enforcement officer.

(1) Upon request, every pawnbroker and secondhand dealer doing business in the state shall furnish a full, true, and correct transcript of the record of all transactions conducted on the preceding day. These transactions shall be recorded on such forms as may be provided and in such format as may be required by the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer within a specified time not less than twenty-four hours. This information may be transmitted to the applicable law enforcement agency electronically, by facsimile transmission, or by modem or similar device, or by delivery of computer disk subject to the requirements of, and approval by, the chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer.

(2) If a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer has good cause to believe that any property in his or her possession has been previously lost or stolen, the pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall promptly report that fact to the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer, together with the name of the owner, if known, and the date when, and the name of the person from whom it was received.

[ 1991 c 323 s 3; 1984 c 10 s 6; 1909 c 249 s 231; RRS s 2483.]